Washington statutes.
RCW 36.56.030

Hearing.

At the time scheduled for the hearing in the ordinance or resolution of intention, the county legislative authority shall consider the assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the metropolitan municipal corporation, and hear those appearing and all protests and objections to it. The county legislative authority may continue the hearing from time to time, not exceeding sixty days in all.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 277 s 3.]